District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.89

District’s contributions to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with fiscal year 1976 the District share of the cost of the adopted regional system described in subchapter VI of Chapter 11 of Title 9 may be payable from the proceeds of the sale of District general obligation bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 808, Pub. L. 93-198, title IV, § 489

Cross References

Borrowing, general obligation bonds, see 1-204.61 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2455.
1973 Ed., § 1-1443a.